Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 1. Alaska Militia.
Sec. 26.05.226.
Contributions.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs shall contribute to the Alaska National Guard and Alaska Naval Militia retirement system the amounts determined by the Alaska Retirement Management Board as necessary to

fund the system based on the actuarial requirements of the system as established by the Alaska Retirement Management Board; and

administer the system.

The amount required for contributions from the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs under (a) of this section shall be included in the annual appropriations made to the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs.

History.

(§ 17 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 14 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 34 ch 137 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 58, § 6 (1984); am § 52 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 146, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, the 2005 amendment of subsection (a) of this section made by § 52 ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, is retroactive to July 1, 2005.

Sec. 26.05.227.
[Renumbered as AS 26.05.229.]

Sec. 26.05.228.
Accounting and investment.

The commissioner of administration shall establish a military retirement trust fund for the system in which the assets of the system are deposited and held. The commissioner shall maintain accounts and records for the system.

All income of the fund and all disbursements made by the fund shall be credited or charged, whichever is appropriate, to the following accounts:

an individual account for each retired member of the system that records the benefits paid under this system to the member or surviving beneficiary;

a separate account for the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs’ contribution to fund the system based on the actuarial requirements of the system as established by the commissioner of administration under AS

26.05.222

—

26.05.229

;

an expense account for the system; this account is charged with all disbursements representing administrative expenses incurred by the system; expenditures from this account are included in the governor’s budget for each fiscal year.

The Alaska Retirement Management Board is the fiduciary of the fund and has the same powers and duties under this section in regard to the fund as are provided under AS

37.10.220

.

History.

(§ 36 ch 137 SLA 1982; E.O. No. 58, § 7 (1984); am § 12 ch 82 SLA 1986; am §§ 16, 17 ch 141 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 53 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 3 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 7, 2016, at the end of (b)(2), substituted “AS

26.05.222

—

26.05.229

” for “this chapter”. Although the 2016 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2016, under § 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, the governor did not sign the bill until August 6, 2016, and so the actual effective date of the 2016 amendment was August 7, 2016, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 146, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, the 2005 amendment of subsection (c) of this section made by § 53 ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, is retroactive to July 1, 2005.

Sec. 26.05.229.
Definitions.

In AS

26.05.222

—

26.05.228

,

“beneficiary” means a person designated by a member in a writing filed with the system by the member while alive to receive benefits that may be due from the system upon the death of the member;

“member” means a commissioned or warrant officer or an enlisted person in the Alaska National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia;

“qualified domestic relations order” means a divorce or dissolution judgment under AS 25.24, including an order approving a property settlement, that

creates or recognizes the existence of an alternate payee’s right to, or assigns to an alternate payee the right to, receive all or a portion of the benefits payable with respect to a member;

sets out the name and last known mailing address, if any, of the member and of each alternate payee covered by the order;

sets out the amount or percentage of the member’s benefit, or of any survivor’s benefit, to be paid to the alternate payee, or sets out the manner in which that amount or percentage is to be determined;

sets out the number of payments or period to which the order applies;

does not require any type or form of benefit or any option not otherwise provided by AS

26.05.222

—

26.05.228

;

does not require an increase of benefits in excess of the amount provided by AS

26.05.222

—

26.05.228

, determined on the basis of actuarial value; and

does not require the payment, to an alternate payee, of benefits that are required to be paid to another alternate payee under another order previously determined to be a qualified domestic relations order;

“system” means the Alaska National Guard and Alaska Naval Militia retirement system.

History.

(§ 17 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 15 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 35 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 31 ch 117 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

26.05.227

.
Renumbered in 1986. Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Sec. 26.05.230.
Armories, training sites, and maintenance facilities.

Buildings and sites for armory purposes may be leased or constructed, based upon location and size of units to be organized, and shall be financed through state and federal appropriations or both. These facilities may be made available by local communities or by the cooperative arrangement between the state and the federal government and any local community. Leasing and construction under this subsection are governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

The armory of each battalion, company, or other unit is subject to the order of the adjutant general and under the charge of its armory board which shall keep in the armory all property furnished by the state. Except for scout battalions organized under special authority of the Secretary of the Army, a unit may not be furnished with arms or equipment until a suitable armory is provided for their deposit. Subject to regulations adopted by the adjutant general, an armory may be used for any reasonable and legitimate civilian activity so long as the activity does not interfere with its use for military purposes. Proceeds received as rental or otherwise at an armory from nonmilitary use shall be deposited in the general fund.

The adjutant general shall administer all target ranges belonging to or leased by the state for National Guard purposes. Gallery ranges may be maintained at all armories occupied by state troops and every command shall be given suitable instruction in marksmanship under direction of its commander, and regulations as authorized by the adjutant general.

History.

(§ 25 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 101 SLA 1966; am § 25 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 46 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 12 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Sec. 26.05.235.
Active duty training sites.

Unless prohibited by federal regulation, no less than once every two training years, each unit of the Alaska Army National Guard shall train for annual active duty training at a site other than its regular base training site. Every effort shall be made to select a training site in a different type of environment from that of the regular base training site.

History.

(§ 2 ch 35 SLA 1976)

Sec. 26.05.240.
Enlisted persons.

An able-bodied person of good character who is a citizen of the United States or has declared an intention of becoming a citizen is eligible for enlistment in the National Guard or Naval Militia at the ages and for the periods of time that are prescribed in federal or state regulations in effect at time of enlistment.

History.

(§ 26 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 141 SLA 1972; am § 8 ch 34 SLA 1973)

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Military and Civil Defense, § 48 et seq.

64 C.J.S. Armed Services § 343.

Validity of governmental requirements of oath of allegiance or loyalty.
18 ALR2d 268.

Sec. 26.05.250.
Discharges.

An enlisted person who is discharged from service in the organized militia of the state shall receive a notice of discharge in writing in the form and classification prescribed by state law or regulations.
In time of peace or when there is no declaration of national emergency, a discharge may be given before the expiration of terms of enlistment under regulations prescribed by competent authority.

History.

(§ 27 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 6 ch 141 SLA 1972)

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Military and Civil Defense, § 34.

Judicial review of military action with respect to type of discharge given member of Armed Forces, 92 ALR Fed. 333.

Sec. 26.05.260.
Pay and allowances.

The adjutant general is charged with all disbursements of pay and allowances for service of the troops.

When active state service is authorized by the governor or by the adjutant general as the governor’s designee, members of the organized militia are entitled to receive, for each day of active service under AS

26.05.070

, pay in an amount equal to the pay received by a member of the regular armed forces of the United States in the same grade and rank as the member of the organized militia.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 56 SLA 1981.]

A member of the organized militia who, while performing duties under AS

26.05.070

or training under AS

26.05.100

, including transit to and from the member’s home of record, suffers an injury or disability in the line of duty is entitled to all compensation and benefits available under AS 23.30 (Alaska Workers’ Compensation Act). For a member of the Alaska State Defense Force, compensation and benefits under this subsection are provided as though the member were a state employee. A member of the organized militia who has not been ordered into active state service by the governor under AS

26.05.070

or ordered into training under AS

26.05.100

is not entitled to compensation and benefits under AS 23.30 (Alaska Workers’ Compensation Act).

If a member of the organized militia dies as a result of an injury or disability suffered in the line of duty while performing duties under AS

26.05.070

or training under AS

26.05.100

, including transit to and from the member’s home of record, death benefits shall be paid to the persons in the amounts specified in AS

23.30.215

. For a member of the Alaska State Defense Force, the death benefits under this subsection are provided as though the member were a state employee. A person is not entitled to death benefits as specified in AS

23.30.215

for a member of the organized militia who dies as a result of an injury or disability suffered in the line of duty but who had not been ordered into active state service by the governor under AS

26.05.070

or ordered into training under AS

26.05.100

.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 56 SLA 1981.]

[Repealed, § 8 ch 56 SLA 1981.]

For purposes of computation of benefits under AS 23.30, the earnings of a member of the

Alaska National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia are presumed to be no less than 200 percent of the minimum daily basic pay authorized for a member of the regular armed forces of the United States in the same grade or rank as the Alaska National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia member at the time of the injury or death;

Alaska State Defense Force are presumed to be equal to the pay and allowances authorized by (j) of this section for the duties being performed by the member while on active state service at the time of the injury or death; if the member of the Alaska State Defense Force did not receive pay or allowances authorized under (j) of this section, the earnings of the member are presumed to be no less than 200 percent of the minimum daily basic pay authorized for a member of the regular armed forces of the United States in the same grade or rank as the Alaska State Defense Force member at the time of the injury or death.

When active state service is authorized by the governor or by the adjutant general as the governor’s designee, members of the organized militia are entitled to receive, for each day of active service under AS

26.05.070

, allowances to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same conditions as provided for state officials and employees under AS

39.20.110

—

39.20.170

. However, pay or allowances are not authorized for training or community service activities of members of the Alaska State Defense Force.

Members of the Alaska State Defense Force are not state employees. However, compensation and benefits under AS 23.30 provided for in (d), (e), and (h) of this section for members of the Alaska State Defense Force are provided as though the member were a state employee. Nothing in this section entitles a member of the Alaska State Defense Force to retirement benefits.

An order into active state service under AS

26.05.070

constitutes an administrative order under AS

39.20.345

.

When active state service is authorized by the governor for the purpose of training or full-time duty with the office of the adjutant general, members of the Alaska National Guard and Alaska Naval Militia are entitled to receive, for each day of active state service, the same benefits provided for state employees under AS 39 so long as the member would otherwise qualify for those benefits if the member were a state employee.

In this section,

[Repealed, § 5 ch 84 SLA 2018.]

“wildland fire” includes the uncontrolled burning of grass, brush, timber, and other natural vegetative material.

History.

(§ 28 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 19 SLA 1968; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 141 SLA 1972; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 34 SLA 1973; am §§ 1 — 4, 8 ch 56 SLA 1981; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 53 SLA 1989; am §§ 5 — 10 ch 70 SLA 2000; am §§ 5, 6 ch 43 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 21 SLA 2008; am §§ 2, 3 ch 50 SLA 2008; am §§ 2, 3 ch 83 SLA 2018; am §§ 1 — 5 ch 84 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 1989, 2000, and 2018, to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose applicable to the 2003 amendments of (d) and (e) of this section, see § 1, ch. 43, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, effective November 11, 2018, in (d), inserted “or training under AS

26.05.100

” following “duties under AS

26.05.070

” in the first sentence, and “or ordered into training under AS

26.05.100

” following “governor under AS

26.05.070

” in the third sentence; in (e), inserted “or training under AS 26.05.100” following “duties under AS 26.05.070” in the first sentence, and “or ordered into training under AS 26.05.100” at the end of the last sentence.

The second 2018 amendment, effective November 11, 2018, rewrote (b); in (i), substituted “organized militia” for “Alaska State Defense Force” following “members of the”, deleted “pay and” preceding “allowances”, and deleted “as provided in this subsection, pay is equal to that provided under AS

39.27.011(a)

– (f) and

39.27.020

for equivalent assignments of state officials or employees, including adjustments under AS

39.27.025

, if applicable allowances shall be paid” preceding “to the same extent”; in (j), at the beginning, deleted “Members of the Alaska State Defense Force are entitled to pay and other benefits only as provided in this section.”; repealed (k)(1) [now (m)(1)]; added (

l

) and (m) [now (k) and (

l

)].

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2003 (HB 245), which amended this section, see 2003 House Journal 777— 783.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 50, SLA 2008 (HB 326) relating to use of the organized militia in active service, including service related to fighting wildfires, see 2008 House Journal 1737 — 1739.

Sec. 26.05.262.
Disposition of remains of members of organized militia.

If a member of the organized militia who is in active state service has executed the United States Department of Defense Military Record of Emergency Data Form (DD Form 93), or its successor form, to serve as a record of emergency data and, on that form, has designated a person who is authorized to direct the disposition of the member’s remains if the member dies while in a duty status as described in 10 U.S.C. 1481, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the person authorized to direct the disposition of remains on the executed form has the right to make the decisions concerning the disposition of the member’s remains.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 2011)

Sec. 26.05.263.
Payment of Servicemembers’ Group Life Insurance premiums; establishment of fund.

The Servicemembers’ Group Life Insurance premium fund is established as a separate fund in the state treasury. The fund consists of appropriations by the legislature to it. Money appropriated to the fund does not lapse. The state shall hold the principal and earnings of the fund for the purpose of reimbursing eligible members of the Alaska National Guard deployed to a combat zone for premiums paid under 38 U.S.C. 1965 — 1980 (Servicemembers’ Group Life Insurance Program).

The adjutant general may make expenditures from the fund to reimburse eligible members of the Alaska National Guard deployed to a combat zone for premiums paid under the program during the period of

deployment if the eligible member applies for reimbursement within two years after returning to the state following deployment;

up to one year of convalescence following the return from deployment; and

with the approval of the adjutant general, up to one year of convalescence in addition to the year under (2) of this subsection.

Subject to appropriation, the fund may be used to pay the expenses incurred by the commissioner of revenue in managing the fund and administrative expenses incurred by the Department of Revenue in administering this section.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, money in the fund is available for expenditure without further appropriation.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

The Department of Revenue may adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

In this section,

“combat zone” means an area of hostile fire or imminent danger that entitles a member on duty in that area to special pay;

“convalescence” means hospital, outpatient, or rehabilitation treatment for an injury suffered while deployed to a combat zone;

“fund” means the Servicemembers’ Group Life Insurance premium fund;

“program” means the Servicemembers’ Group Life Insurance program established by 38 U.S.C. 1965 — 1980.

History.

(§ 48 ch 80 SLA 2006)

Sec. 26.05.265.
Reenlistment bonus.

Subject to legislative appropriation and (c) of this section, an enlisted member of the Alaska National Guard or the Alaska Naval Militia who extends or reenlists within 30 days after completing a term of service is entitled to a bonus if

the extension or reenlistment is for the maximum authorized term;

at the time of the extension or reenlistment the member has not less than three years of service creditable for retirement purposes; and

on completion of the term for which the member extends or reenlists, the member will have not more than 12 years of service creditable for retirement purposes.

The bonus is $500 for each year of extension or reenlistment, but may not exceed a total of $3,000 for a member’s entire service. The bonus is payable at the satisfactory completion of each year of extension or reenlistment. A pro rata share of the bonus shall be paid to an enlisted member of the Alaska National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia for that portion of a year satisfactorily served before

becoming ineligible because of full-time employment with the National Guard or the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs, as described in (c) of this section;

dying or being disabled, if the member’s death or disability was not caused by the member’s own misconduct; or

being discharged from enlisted status to accept a warrant or commission as an officer in the National Guard.

An enlisted member of the Alaska National Guard or Alaska Naval Militia is not eligible for the reenlistment bonus provided in (a) of this section if the enlisted member is a full-time employee of the

National Guard as a technician under 32 U.S.C. 709;

National Guard as an active guard reserve employee under 32 U.S.C. 502(f); or

Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs whose salary is paid by the state and if the department requires that the employee belong to the Alaska National Guard or the Alaska Naval Militia in order to hold the position.

History.

(§ 1 ch 204 SLA 1970; am § 12 ch 34 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 95 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 56 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 184 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For transition provisions relating to the 1981 and 1983 amendments to this section, see § 7, ch. 56, SLA 1981, and § 2, ch. 62, SLA 1983, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 26.05.270.
Payment of military claims.

All bills, claims, and demands for military purposes shall be certified and audited as prescribed by law and shall be paid from the state general fund in the normal manner upon submission of vouchers by the adjutant general. If the organized militia, or any part of it, is called into active service of the state in case of war, disaster, insurrection, rebellion, tumult, riot, invasion, breach of peace, or to execute or enforce the law, vouchers for legally allowed pay and expenses for this service or compensation for injuries shall be drawn upon the general fund of the state treasury and paid out of money in that fund not otherwise appropriated.

History.

(§ 29 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 19 SLA 1968)

Sec. 26.05.280.
Transportation, subsistence, and supplies.

There shall be provided by the state, transportation and subsistence for all officers and enlisted persons who are ordered into active service by the state for encampment, field duty, or other duty. Necessary transportation, stores, and subsistence for troops when ordered on duty shall be contracted by the proper officers and paid for as other military bills.
Contracting under this section is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

History.

(§ 30 ch 150 SLA 1955; am § 10 ch 141 SLA 1972; am § 26 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Collateral references. —

Right of member of Armed Forces to recover from manufacturer or seller for injury caused by defective military material, equipment, supplies, or components thereof.
38 ALR3d 1247.

Sec. 26.05.290.
Further equipment and armories.

The governor may requisition from the Secretary of Defense the arms and equipment that are available for state forces, and make available to state forces the facilities of state armories not required by the federal government and their equipment as may be available.

History.

(§ 31 ch 150 SLA 1955)

Sec. 26.05.295.
Educational assistance for enlisted personnel.

Each active enlisted member of the Alaska National Guard or the Alaska Naval Militia who has completed the initial voluntary enlistment period of service that fulfills the mandatory requirement for military service under 50 U.S.C. App. 451 — 456, 458 — 471 (Military Selective Service Act of 1967) is eligible for educational assistance benefits in Alaska educational facilities.

Except as provided in this subsection, educational programs and monetary benefits available to persons under (a) of this section are based on and equivalent to those of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs education program. Educational assistance may only be provided for a program or class in which the person is a student in good standing.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 25 SLA 1997.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 25 SLA 1997.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 248 SLA 1970; am §§ 13, 14 ch 34 SLA 1973; am §§ 1, 2 ch 132 SLA 1976; am §§ 6, 7 ch 93 SLA 1991; am §§ 1, 2, 5 ch 25 SLA 1997; am § 80 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Editor’s notes. —

Former 50 U.S.C. App. 451 – 50 U.S.C. App. 471 (Military Selective Service Act) have been transferred to 50 U.S.C. 3801 – 50 U.S.C. 3808.

Sec. 26.05.296.
Tuition assistance.

To the extent funds are available, the adjutant general may authorize the payment of up to 100 percent of the cost of tuition and required fees for each active member of the Alaska National Guard or the Alaska Naval Militia if the member attends an educational, vocational, or technical training school in this state. The adjutant general may prioritize categories of education benefits to encourage recruitment and retention of Alaska National Guard members. Payments authorized under this section for active members of the Alaska National Guard or the Alaska Naval Militia continue so long as the active member is a student in good standing in the educational program or class and participates satisfactorily in unit training activities.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 25 SLA 1997.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 132 SLA 1976; am § 6 ch 56 SLA 1981; am § 8 ch 93 SLA 1991; am §§ 3, 5 ch 25 SLA 1997)

Sec. 26.05.298.
Definition for AS 26.05.295 and 26.05.296.

In AS

26.05.295

and

26.05.296

, “good standing” means the student is enrolled, attending, and meeting the minimum requirements for successful completion of the program or class.

History.

(§ 4 ch 25 SLA 1997)

Sec. 26.05.300.
Statement of policy on military justice.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 55 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 26.05.310.
Military courts for the Alaska militia.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 55 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 26.05.320.
General court-martial.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 55 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 26.05.322.
Special court-martial.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 55 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 26.05.324.
Summary court-martial.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 55 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 26.05.326.
Appeal from court-martial convictions.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 55 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 26.05.330.
Expenses of military courts.

[For current law see AS 26.05.360 — 26.05.900.]

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 55 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 26.05.340.
Restrictions on and protection of militia.

In no case may any part of the Alaska National Guard, Alaska Naval Militia, or the Alaska State Defense Force be used against any labor organization or for the purpose of strike breaking within the state.

No part of the state military forces may leave the state with arms and equipment without the consent of the commander in chief.

A person who, either alone or with another, wilfully deprives a member of the National Guard or Naval Militia of employment or prevents the member from being self-employed or employed by another or obstructs or annoys the member or the member’s employer with respect to their trade, business, or employment because the member of the National Guard or Naval Militia is a member, or in any way dissuades any person from enlisting in the National Guard or Naval Militia by threat or injury to the person with respect to the person’s employment, trade or business if the person so enlists, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $100.

All matters relating to the organization, discipline, and government of the National Guard or Naval Militia, not otherwise provided for by the laws of the United States, this chapter, or regulations adopted by the president shall be governed by regulations adopted by the adjutant general and approved by the governor, and the regulations when adopted have the same force and effect as though enacted in this chapter.

History.

(§ 36 ch 150 SLA 1955; am §§ 18 — 20 ch 34 SLA 1973; am § 11 ch 70 SLA 2000)

Sec. 26.05.342.
Alaska Decoration of Honor.

There is created an Alaska Decoration of Honor. The Alaska Decoration of Honor may be awarded to an individual who has been killed in action on or after the date Alaska achieved statehood while

engaged in an action against any enemy of the United States;

engaged in military operations involving conflict with an opposing foreign force;

serving with friendly foreign forces engaged in an armed conflict against an opposing armed force in which the United States is not a belligerent party; or

serving in or deploying to or from a combat zone as designated by presidential order.

To be eligible to receive the Alaska Decoration of Honor, an individual must have been, at the time the individual was killed in action, a member of

the Alaska National Guard who was a legal resident of the state;

the United States military reserves who was a legal resident of the state; or

the regular United States armed forces who was

a legal resident of the state; or

stationed in the state by a proper order of the United States Department of Defense.

The Alaska Decoration of Honor shall be awarded by a concurrent resolution drafted in consultation with the adjutant general’s office. The resolution must be

introduced by the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, a member of the legislature who is the authorized representative of the president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives, or the chair of the committee of each house of the legislature with primary jurisdiction over military and veterans’ affairs; and

adopted by both houses of the legislature.

The Joint Armed Services Committee shall make arrangements for the designing and awarding of the Alaska Decoration of Honor.

The adjutant general shall

annually obtain from the United States government a list of individuals who fulfill the criteria described in (a)(1) — (4) and (b)(1) — (3) of this section during the previous calendar year; and

not later than December 31 each year, provide this list of individuals to the president of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives; the adjutant general may edit the list to remove from it the name of any individual whose service, in the judgment of the adjutant general, would have resulted in the individual’s discharge or release under conditions that were other than honorable.

The adjutant general shall enter the name of each recipient of the Alaska Decoration of Honor on the Alaska Decoration of Honor Roll maintained under AS

26.05.190(e)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 2007)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 3, ch. 45, SLA 2007, the initial list obtained under (e)(1) of this section “must include all individuals who meet the criteria described in [(a)(1)-(4) and (b)(1)-(3) of this section] and were killed in action at some time after January 2, 1959 and before January 1, 2007.”

Secs. 26.05.345 — 26.05.347.
Civil Air Patrol; transfer of forfeited aircraft.
[Repealed, E.O. No. 59, § 3 (1985).
For current law see AS 18.60.146.]

Sec. 26.05.350.
Short title.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 55 SLA 2016.]